Washington statutes.
RCW 19.390.010

Intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that competition beneficial to consumers in health care markets across Washington remains vigorous and robust. The legislature supports that intent through this chapter, which provides the attorney general with notice of all material health care transactions in this state so that the attorney general has the information necessary to determine whether an investigation under the consumer protection act is warranted for potential anticompetitive conduct and consumer harm. This chapter is intended to supplement the federal Hart-Scott-Rodino antitrust improvements act, Title 15 U.S.C. Sec. 18a, by requiring notice of transactions not reportable under Hart-Scott-Rodino reporting thresholds and by providing the attorney general with a copy of any filings made pursuant to the Hart-Scott-Rodino act.

[ 2019 c 267 s 1.]